Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Right to Dissent and Obtain Payment for Shares

48-23-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Beneficial shareholder” means the person who is a beneficial owner of shares held by a nominee as the record shareholder;

“Corporation” means the issuer of the shares held by a dissenter before the corporate action, and, for purposes of §§ 48-23-203 — 48-23-302, includes the survivor of a merger or conversion or the acquiring entity in a share exchange of that issuer;

“Dissenter” means a shareholder who is entitled to dissent from corporate action under § 48-23-102 and who exercises that right when and in the manner required by part 2 of this chapter;

“Fair value,” with respect to a dissenter's shares, means the value of the shares immediately before the effectuation of the corporate action to which the dissenter objects, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of the corporate action;

“Interest” means interest from the effective date of the corporate action that gave rise to the shareholder's right to dissent until the date of payment, at the average auction rate paid on United States treasury bills with a maturity of six (6) months (or the closest maturity thereto) as of the auction date for such treasury bills closest to such effective date;

“Record shareholder” means the person in whose name shares are registered in the records of a corporation or the beneficial owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate on file with a corporation; and

“Shareholder” means the record shareholder or the beneficial shareholder.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.01; 2012, ch. 1051, § 41.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Tennessee Control Share Acquisition Act, title 48, ch. 103, part 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-812, 5-1108.

48-23-102. Right to dissent.

A shareholder is entitled to dissent from, and obtain payment of the fair value of the shareholder's shares in the event of, any of the following corporate actions:

Consummation of a plan of merger to which the corporation is a party:

If shareholder approval is required for the merger by § 48-21-104 or the charter and the shareholder is entitled to vote on the merger if the merger is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting or the shareholder is a nonconsenting shareholder under § 48-17-104(b) who would have been entitled to vote on the merger if the merger had been submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting; or

If the corporation is a subsidiary that is merged with its parent under § 48-21-105;

Consummation of a plan of share exchange to which the corporation is a party as the corporation whose shares will be acquired, if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the plan if the plan is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting or the shareholder is a nonconsenting shareholder under § 48-17-104(b) who would have been entitled to vote on the plan if the plan had been submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting;

Consummation of a sale or exchange of all, or substantially all, of the property of the corporation other than in the usual and regular course of business, if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the sale or exchange if the sale or exchange is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting or the shareholder is a nonconsenting shareholder under § 48-17-104(b) who would have been entitled to vote on the sale or exchange if the sale or exchange had been submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, including a sale of all, or substantially all, of the property of the corporation in dissolution, but not including a sale pursuant to court order or a sale for cash pursuant to a plan by which all or substantially all of the net proceeds of the sale will be distributed to the shareholders within one (1) year after the date of sale;

An amendment of the charter that materially and adversely affects rights in respect of a dissenter's shares because it:

Alters or abolishes a preferential right of the shares;

Creates, alters, or abolishes a right in respect of redemption, including a provision respecting a sinking fund for the redemption or repurchase, of the shares;

Alters or abolishes a preemptive right of the holder of the shares to acquire shares or other securities;

Excludes or limits the right of the shares to vote on any matter, or to cumulate votes, other than a limitation by dilution through issuance of shares or other securities with similar voting rights; or

Reduces the number of shares owned by the shareholder to a fraction of a share, if the fractional share is to be acquired for cash under § 48-16-104;

Any corporate action taken pursuant to a shareholder vote to the extent the charter, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors provides that voting or nonvoting shareholders are entitled to dissent and obtain payment for their shares;

Consummation of a conversion of the corporation to another entity pursuant to chapter 21 of this title; or

In accordance with and to the extent provided in § 48-28-104(b), an amendment to the charter of a corporation as described in § 48-28-104(b)(1), or consummation of a merger or plan of share exchange as described in § 48-28-104(b)(2).

A shareholder entitled to dissent and obtain payment for the shareholder's shares under this chapter may not challenge the corporate action creating the shareholder's entitlement unless the action is unlawful or fraudulent with respect to the shareholder or the corporation.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), no shareholder may dissent as to any shares of a security which, as of the date of the effectuation of the transaction which would otherwise give rise to dissenters' rights, is listed on an exchange registered under § 6 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78f), as amended, or is a “national market system security,” as defined in rules promulgated pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78a), as amended.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.02; 2012, ch. 1051, §§ 42-44; 2015, ch. 497, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1108.

Law Reviews.

The Purpose of the Shareholders' Appraisal Remedy, 65 Tenn. L. Rev. 661 (1998).

Valuation of Dissenters' Stock Under the Appraisal Remedy — Is the Delaware Block Method Right for Tennessee? (Don S. Clardy), 62 Tenn. L. Rev. 285 (1995).

48-23-103. Dissent by nominees and beneficial owners.

A record shareholder may assert dissenters' rights as to fewer than all the shares registered in the record shareholder's name only if the record shareholder dissents with respect to all shares beneficially owned by any one (1) person and notifies the corporation in writing of the name and address of each person on whose behalf the record shareholder asserts dissenters' rights. The rights of a partial dissenter under this subsection (a) are determined as if the shares as to which the partial dissenter dissents and the partial dissenter's other shares were registered in the names of different shareholders.

A beneficial shareholder may assert dissenters' rights as to shares of any one (1) or more classes held on the beneficial shareholder's behalf only if the beneficial shareholder:

Submits to the corporation the record shareholder's written consent to the dissent not later than the time the beneficial shareholder asserts dissenters' rights; and

Does so with respect to all shares of the same class of which the person is the beneficial shareholder or over which the person has power to direct the vote.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.03.